Washington statutes.
RCW 18.390.090

Scope of chapter—Limitation.

Nothing in this chapter:

(1) Affects any of the requirements and standards associated with a license to operate an assisted living facility under chapter 18.20 RCW or a nursing home under chapter 18.51 RCW; and

(2) Applies to any of the provisions of chapter 74.46 or 70.38 RCW.

[ 2016 c 183 s 9.]